seg/mar.2.dix
    <!-- be -->
    <pardef n="/असणे__vaux">
      <!-- infinitives -->
      <e>     <p><l>असणे</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- gerunds -->
      <!-- same as infinitive in the nominative -->
      <e>     <p><l>असण</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>

      <!-- adjectival forms -->
      <e>         <p><l>असलेल</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__big_suff"/></e>

      <!-- r problems -->
      <e>         <p><l>असणा</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__gpr_gen"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>असायला</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>असून</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>असताना</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>असतांना</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>  
      <e>     <p><l>असत</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>असता</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>असू</l><r>असणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      

      <e>         <p><l>आहे</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>आहो</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>आहोत</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e r="LR">   <p><l>आहे</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>आहेस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>आहा</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>आहात</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>आहे</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>आहेत</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>         <p><l>होतो</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होते</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होतो</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>होतास</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>होता</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होतीस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>होती</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होता</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>होता</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होती</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होते</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>होतं</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होते</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होत्या</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होती</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <!-- habitual -->
      <e>     <p><l>असे</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>असु</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>असस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>असा</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>असे</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>असत</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- imperative -->
      <e>         <p><l>असू</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>अस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>असा</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>असो</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>असोत</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>अस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_perf"/></e>

      
      <!-- imperfs -->
      <e>         <p><l>अस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_impfv"/></e>


      <!-- future -->
      <e>         <p><l>अस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_fut"/></e>
      
      <!-- predictive -->
      <e>      <p><l>अस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_pred"/></e>

      <!-- subjunctive -->
      <e>         <p><l>अस</l><r>असणे<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_subj"/></e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="असणे">               <i></i><par n="/असणे__vaux"/></e>
